Utah statutes.
17B-1-107.   Recording a release of lien.

If a local district records a lien upon real property or a groundwater right for an unpaid assessment by the owner and the owner then pays the assessment in full, including any interest and penalties, the local district recording the lien shall record the release of the lien.

